Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.625

Rights of Washington national guard and other military reserve students called to active service.

Private vocational schools and private higher education institutions are encouraged to provide students who are members of the Washington national guard or any other military reserve component and who are ordered for a period exceeding thirty days into active state service or federal active military service the same rights and opportunities provided under RCW 28B.10.270 by public higher education institutions.

[ 2004 c 161 s 4; 1991 c 164 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 161: See note following RCW 28B.10.270.